Utah statutes.
4-32-18.   Rules for the construction and operation of slaughterhouses
authorized.
(1)  For the purposes of administering this chapter and qualifying
slaughterhouses for licenses, the department has authority to adopt sanitary
inspection rules and regulations, and all other necessary rules, including
those pertaining to the construction, equipment, and facilities of
slaughterhouses.
(2)  The rules shall, so far as practical, conform with the regulations
promulgated under the federal acts.
